Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1776.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.49 of Title 68, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For tax year 2027 and subsequent tax years, there shall be
allowed against the tax imposed by Section 2355 of Title 68 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, a credit for any individual who is certified to
teach in this state and has begun teaching the eighth consecutive
year for a public school district in this state during the tax year.

Req. No. 3657 Page 1

The credit allowed shall be in the amount of Ten Thousand Dollars
($10,000.00).
B. Any taxpayer claiming the credit authorized by this section
shall continue to teach in the same school district for the
remainder of the eighth year, plus three (3) more consecutive years,
to remain eligible for the credit. Provided, if the taxpayer became
unemployed due to a reduction in force by the school district,
death, or a documented medical hardship, the taxpayer shall remain
eligible. The Commission may conduct an audit to verify the
eligibility of a taxpayer that has claimed the credit authorized
pursuant to this section. The Commission shall recapture the
credits otherwise authorized by the provisions of this section if an
audit conducted shows that the taxpayer became ineligible.
C. If the credit exceeds the tax imposed by Section 2355 of
Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the excess amount shall be
refunded to the taxpayer.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-3657 QD 2/17/2026 7:20:33 PM





Req. No. 3657 Page 2